Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-143
Disciplinary action; appearance by accused; privileges.

At any hearing the accused may appear in person and by counsel, produce evidence and witnesses on his or her own behalf, cross-examine witnesses, and examine such evidence as may be produced against him or her. The accused shall be entitled, on application to the board, to the issuance of subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses on his or her behalf.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 38, p. 69;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 36.